apertium-tt-ba.tt.lexc
LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

%<p1%>%<sg%>:м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%} CLIT ;

!LEXICON V-PERS-S4 ! Volition endings

!%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-FUT-IR
!! verbs that get -рга/-ргә ending should be also put here,
!! since in twol there is a rule deleting %{I%} after vowels
!! e.g. уйна-рга

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS-REAL ;
%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} # ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{I%}р POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;
%<inf%>:%>%{A%}рг%{A%} # ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 

! Participles
%<prc2%>:%>%{I%}п # ; 
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ; 
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{E%}с%{I%} V-PERS-S4 ; 

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>%{U%} POSS-REAL ;
%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS-REAL ; 
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч SUBST ; 
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} POSS-REAL ; 
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS-REAL ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}ч%{A%}к POSS-REAL ;
!! TO REMOVE
!%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS-REAL ; 
!%<ger8%>:%>%{E%}с V-PERS-S4 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;   !# "...кайда икәнен _белсә_ дә, әйтәсе килми..."
%<gna9%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT ;

%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-COMMON-PASSIVE

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ; 

LEXICON V-NEG
%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<neg%>%<ger2%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%}%>ч%{A%} POSS-REAL ;
V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG ;
V-NEG ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-PASS-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON V-IV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
V-COMMON-PASSIVE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON-LEX ;
%<vaux%>%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON COP-I

и%<cop%>%<neg%>:түгел V-PERS-S3 ;
и%<cop%>%<ger5%>:%>икән POSS-REAL ;
и%<cop%>%<ifi%>:%>иде V-PERS-S2 ;        

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

LEXICON PRN-PERS

! FIXME:NOTE: some of these are regular and can eventually be pointed
! to the CASE cont.class; this would make it more concise (but less readable)    

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мин # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:минем # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:миңа # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мине # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:миндә # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:миннән # ; 
!мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:минеке # ; 
!мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:миндәге # ; 

син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:син # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:синең # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:сиңа # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:сине # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:синдә # ; 
син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:синнән # ; 
!син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<px%> : синеке 
!син%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<attr%> : синдәге 

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:аның # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңа # ;             !! also synonymic variants "аңар" and "аңарга" (only analysed)
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңар # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аңарга # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:аны # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:анда # ;            !! also: "аңарда" (only analysed)  !!"анда" "аннан" usually instead of inanimate nouns 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:аңарда # ; Dir/LR
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аннан # ;           !! also: "аңардан" (only analysed) !!"аңарда" "аңардан" -- instead of person
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:аңардан # ; Dir/LR

без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:без # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:безнең # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:безгә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:безне # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:бездә # ; 
без%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:бездән # ; 

сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:сез # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:сезнең # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:сезгә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:сезне # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:сездә # ; 
сез%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:сездән # ; 

алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:алар # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:аларның # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:аларга # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:аларны # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:аларда # ; 
алар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:алардан # ; 

LEXICON PRNDEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу # ;           ! FIXME: these can get possessives too, e.g. монысының, монысына
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:моның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:моңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:моны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:монда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:моннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бо%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNDEM-ŠUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:шул # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:шуның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:шуңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:шуны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:шунда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:шуннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:шул%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON PRNDEM-UL                     ! FIXME: refactor this, link all remaining prn.dem's to one cont. class

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ул # ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:аның # ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:аңа # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:аны # ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:анда # ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:аннан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:алар CASE ;

LEXICON PRNITGLEX

%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON PRNDEMLEX

%<prn%>%<dem%>: CASE ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ; 

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON PRNREFLEX

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS (end)

LEXICON DETDEMLEX

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETQNTLEX 

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETINDLEX

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETITGLEX

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTLEX

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTADVLEX

%<postadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVITGLEX

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVLEX

%<adv%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CALEX

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON QSTLEX

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Particles

мы:мы QSTLEX ; ! ""
!CLIT ;
!CLIT-OTHER ;

LEXICON Copula

!и:и COP-I ; ! ""
COP-I ; ! ""

LEXICON Adverbs 
кайда:кайда ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кайдан:кайдан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кайчан:кайчан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
кая:кая ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ни% өчен:ни% өчен ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ничек:ничек ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
аннары:аннары ADVLEX ; ! ""
аңлатуларынча:аңлатуларынча ADVLEX ; ! ""
башлыча:башлыча ADVLEX ; ! ""
бигрәк:бигрәк ADVLEX ; ! ""
билгеләнүенчә:билгеләнүенчә ADVLEX ; ! ""
билгеләүләрчә:билгеләүләрчә ADVLEX ; ! ""
быел:быел ADVLEX ; ! ""
бүген:бүген ADVLEX ; ! ""
бөтенләй:бөтенләй ADVLEX ; ! ""
гадәттәгечә:гадәттәгечә ADVLEX ; ! ""
иң:иң ADVLEX ; ! ""
моңача:моңача ADVLEX ; ! ""
сүзләренчә:сүзләренчә ADVLEX ; ! ""
тагы:тагы ADVLEX ; ! ""
тик:тик ADVLEX ; ! ""
тышта:тышта ADVLEX ; ! ""
тәфсирләп:тәфсирләп ADVLEX ; ! ""
хәзер:хәзер ADVLEX ; ! ""
җәмгысе:җәмгысе ADVLEX ; ! ""
һәрвакыт:һәрвакыт ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйтүләренчә:әйтүләренчә ADVLEX ; ! ""
әлегә:әлегә ADVLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
аныкла:аныкла V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
аралаш:аралаш V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
арт:арт V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ары:ары V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ачыл:ачыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
ашырыл:ашырыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
аякка% бас:аякка% бас V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
аңлат:аңлат V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
багышлан:багышлан V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
барыл:барыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
барып% чык:барып% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бас:бас V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
басыл:басыл V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
баш% каг:баш% каг V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
белдер:белдер V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бет:бет V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
билгелән:билгелән V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
боз:боз V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
борчы:борчы V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бул:бул V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
булып% чык:булып% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бүлеш:бүлеш V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
бүләк% ит:бүләк% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
бәялән:бәялән V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
гафу% ит:гафу% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
гомер% ит:гомер% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
исем% куш:исем% куш V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
исемлә:исемлә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
истә% тот:истә% тот V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
йөгер:йөгер V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кабул% ит:кабул% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кайтарып% бир:кайтарып% бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
карал:карал V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
карар% ит:карар% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
карар% ит:карар% ит V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
кач:кач V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
килеп% чык:килеп% чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
кит:кит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
киңәйтел:киңәйтел V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
куллан:куллан V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күзәт:күзәт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күн:күн V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
күр:күр V-TV-NOPASS-IR-LEX ; ! ""
күр:күрен V-TV-PASS-IR-LEX ; ! ""
көлемсерә:көлемсерә V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
көт:көт V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
озат:озат V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
пычран:пычран V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сайла:сайла V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сат:сат V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сиз:сиз V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сора:сора V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
сөйләп% бир:сөйләп% бир V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
таләп% ит:таләп% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тапшыр:тапшыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
таркал:таркал V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тукта:тукта V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тын% ал:тын% ал V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
тын:тын V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
тәкъдим% ит:тәкъдим% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
уйла:уйла V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
файдалан:файдалан V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
фаразла:фаразла V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
хезмәт% ит:хезмәт% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
хәбәр% ит:хәбәр% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
хәтердә% тот:хәтердә% тот V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чакыр:чакыр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
чиш:чиш V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
чык:чык V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
эзлә:эзлә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
эш% ит:эш% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
юнәлт:юнәлт V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
яз:яз V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яр:яр V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ярдәм% ит:ярдәм% ит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ярдәм% ит:ярдәм% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
җибәр:җибәр V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
җит:җит V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
җәлеп% ит:җәлеп% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
әзерлә:әзерлә V-TV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
әзерлән:әзерлән V-IV-IR-LEX ; ! ""
әйлән:әйлән V-IV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
өмет% ит:өмет% ит V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
сөй:сөй V-TV-AR-LEX ; ! ""
ал:ал VAUX ; ! ""
башла:башла VAUX ; ! ""
бет:бет VAUX ; ! ""
бетер:бетер VAUX ; ! "" ! FIXME:causative
бир:бир VAUX ; ! ""
бул:бул VAUX ; ! ""
йөр:йөр VAUX ; ! ""
кит:кит VAUX ; ! ""
кил:кил VAUX ; ! ""
чык:чык VAUX ; ! ""
ят:ят VAUX ; ! ""
